Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 4. Alcoholism and Drug Abuse.

Cross references. —

For Uniform Alcoholism and Intoxication Treatment Act, see AS 47.37.

Sec. 47.30.470.
Powers and duties of department.

The department shall

ascertain and keep current a list of all institutions in the state that have available facilities for the care and treatment of alcoholics and drug abusers;

encourage the development and advancement of standards of treatment of alcoholics and drug abusers in institutions;

promote and encourage educational activities to make the public aware of the effects of intemperate use of alcoholic beverages and drugs, and promote and encourage the education of the general public about scientific facts regarding alcoholism and drug abuse;

identify and utilize whatever facilities and services are available or can be made available through community organization for carrying out the purposes of this section, including identification and utilization for detoxification of under-utilized hospital beds;

engage in research and educational activities that will aid in the understanding of alcoholism and drug abuse and in the treatment of alcoholics and drug abusers;

administer a community grant-in-aid program for alcoholism and drug abuse;

submit an annual report concerning alcoholism and drug abuse in the state and the grant-in-aid program within 10 days after the convening of the legislature in each regular session;

prepare that part of the plan for the integrated comprehensive mental health program under AS

47.30.056

that relates to the services and facilities that are necessary for the care and treatment of persons identified as chronic alcoholics suffering from psychoses, as defined in AS

47.30.056(b)(3)

and (f); in preparing the plan of services for persons identified in this paragraph, the department shall coordinate with the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority and the Advisory Board on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse;

use money awarded to the department by grant or contract from the mental health trust settlement income account established under AS

37.14.036

and appropriated from the general fund to provide the necessary services identified in (8) of this section and in accordance with AS

47.30.056

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 163 SLA 1966; am §§ 1, 3 ch 101 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 117 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 71 § 9 (1988); am § 27 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 29 ch 5 FSSLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (7) was enacted as § 3, ch. 101, SLA 1970 and was codified in 1970.

In 1996, in paragraph (9) of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.

Sec. 47.30.475.
Grant-in-aid program.

A nonprofit corporation, a city or borough government, or other political subdivision of the state, or a combination of these, is eligible for grant-in-aid funds under this section. Applications shall be sent to the department.

Money available under this section shall be awarded by the department to applicants on the basis of community need, but only after consideration of comment and advice of the Advisory Board on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse. In awarding grants, the department shall further consider the amount of money that is available for all applications and whether an application would contribute to the wise development of a comprehensive program of alcoholic and drug abuse rehabilitation and prevention.

Grants shall be awarded in a ratio of 75 percent state money to 25 percent community money for the costs of providing staff and limited improvement, renovation, or new construction of facilities for alcohol or drug detoxification, rehabilitation, or “half-way house” care. The department may waive all or part of the requirement that state money be matched by community money if the department finds that community money is unavailable and waiver of the requirement is in the best interests of the state. A grant for improving, renovating, or constructing may not exceed $50,000 except when there is a lack of applicants for available money and then only with the approval of the Advisory Board on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse. The department is not required to award all money available under this program, or the full percentages specified in this subsection, when another source of money is available or could reasonably be made available to the applicant.

Money used by the applicant to qualify for state money may be from any source other than the state. The cost of developing an application is not reimbursable from the grant. The value of real property to be used directly in conjunction with the grant may be used in calculating the required amount of community money, as allowed by regulations of the department.

A grant may not be awarded under this section unless the application includes a plan that provides for

the expenditure of grant money for education and other preventative measures, or the treatment of alcoholics and drug abusers;

the reception of advice and comment from a local advisory board, or, if a local advisory board cannot be formed because the area is sparsely populated, from the governing bodies of private nonprofit health organizations, regarding the design, implementation, and evaluation of the plan and action to be taken;

goals, expressed in quantifiable terms that express the intended effect of the assistance provided under the plan upon the number of individuals needing or utilizing that assistance.

The department shall monitor the implementation of the plan required under (e) of this section, and shall terminate payment of grant money if the plan is not implemented or approval of the program as a public or private treatment program under AS

47.37.140

is not granted within one year of the award of the grant, or is suspended, revoked, limited, or restricted. Modification of the plan required by (e) of this section shall be approved by the department before implementation of the modification.

The department shall provide management training for persons administering a program receiving grant money under this section.

If the department determines, after the award of a grant under (c) of this section, that the community is capable of bearing a greater portion of the cost of a program than originally determined, the department may

reduce the award by that portion of the cost of a program that the department subsequently determined the community could bear; or

terminate payment of the grant entirely.

History.

(§ 2 ch 101 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 126 SLA 1975; am §§ 1, 2 ch 116 SLA 1978; am § 33 ch 168 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 150 SLA 1980; am E.O. No. 71 §§ 10 — 12 (1988); am §§ 20, 21 ch 6 SLA 1993; am §§ 26, 27 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective September 4, 2003, in the first sentence in subsection (c) substituted “75 percent” for “90 percent” and “25 percent” for “10 percent.”

Collateral references. —

Alcoholic as entitled to public assistance under poor laws. 43 ALR3d 554.

Sec. 47.30.477.
Grant-in-aid program regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations implementing AS

47.30.475

. The regulations must provide for the method of application, the time for consideration of applications, the processing of applications, the type of record keeping, the requirements for reporting the progress and statistics regarding the program, and the notification of the applicant as to the action taken on the application. The department shall also establish the necessary forms of application and may adopt other regulations considered necessary to meet the requirements of health and safety and the orderly administration of the grant-in-aid program.
The regulations must include reporting requirements that will permit an evaluation of the success of the program.

History.

(§ 2 ch 101 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 116 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

Sec. 47.30.480.
Judicial notice.

The superior courts of this state may take judicial notice of the fact that an alcoholic is suffering from an illness and is in need of proper medical, advisory, or rehabilitative treatment.

History.

(§ 2 ch 163 SLA 1966)

Sec. 47.30.490.
Acceptance of funds.

The department may accept on behalf of the state and deposit, apart from other public funds, grants from the federal government or gifts or contributions from other sources to assist in carrying out the purposes of AS

47.30.470

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 163 SLA 1966)

Sec. 47.30.500.
Definitions.

In AS

47.30.470

—

47.30.490

,

“alcoholism” means a condition related to alcohol and concerns a physical compulsion which exists, coupled with a mental obsession;

“costs of improvement, renovation, or new construction of facilities” includes, in addition to costs directly related to the project, the sum total of all costs of financing and carrying out the project; these include, but are not limited to, the costs of all necessary studies, surveys, plans and specifications, architectural, engineering, or other special services, acquisition of real property, site preparation and development, purchase, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of real property, and the acquisition of machinery and equipment as may be necessary in connection with the project; an allocable portion of the administrative and operating expenses of the grantee; the cost of financing the project, including interest on bonds issued to finance the project; and the cost of other items, including any indemnity and surety bonds and premiums on insurance, legal fees, fees and expenses of trustees, depositaries, financial advisors, and paying agents for the bonds issued as the issuer considers necessary;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services.

History.

(§ 2 ch 163 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 126 SLA 1975; am § 34 ch 168 SLA 1978; am § 33 ch 23 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1984 to alphabetize the terms defined.